Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon  Youth Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Facility programs......................  $ 225,358,203
(2) Community programs ...............  $ 105,283,845
(3) Program support.......................  $ 78,331,647
(4) Juvenile crime
prevention/diversion..................  $ 23,411,800
(5) Multnomah County gang
prevention services ................... $ 4,003,392
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 26,719,755
(7) Capital improvements ............... $ 1,625,229
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for the following purposes:
(1) Facility programs...................... $ 5,322,803
(2) Community programs ............... $ 2,947,699
(3) Program support ....................... $ 90,001
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Youth  Authority, for the
following purposes:
(1) Community programs ............... $ 43,341,357
(2) Program support ....................... $ 2,376,526
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5041 (HB 5041-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5041 (HB 5041-A) Page 2